Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4102
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) Current economic conditions in the State of Nebraska have resulted in unemployment, outmigration of people, loss of jobs, and difficulty in attracting and retaining business operations; and

(b) Major revisions in Nebraska's tax structure are necessary to accomplish economic revitalization of Nebraska and to be competitive with other states involved in economic revitalization and development.

(2) It is the policy of this state to make revisions in Nebraska's tax structure in order to encourage new businesses to relocate to Nebraska, retain existing businesses and aid in their expansion, promote the creation and retention of new jobs in Nebraska, and attract and retain investment capital in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1987, LB 775, § 2.